North Carolina statutes. Chapter 90B. Social Worker Certification and Licensure Act.
§ 90B-12.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person violating any provision of this Chapter is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1983, c. 495, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 654; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 90B-13.
Injunction.

As an additional remedy, the Board may proceed in a superior court to enjoin and restrain any person from violating the prohibitions of this Chapter. The Board shall not be required to post bond in connection with such proceeding.

History.

1983, c. 495, s. 1.

§ 90B-14.
Third-party reimbursements.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to authorize or require direct third-party reimbursement to persons certified under this Chapter.

History.

1991, c. 732, s. 6.

§ 90B-15.
License or certificate to be displayed.

A person licensed or certified under this Chapter shall conspicuously display the license or certificate issued by the Board at the licensee’s or certificate holder’s primary place of practice.

History.

2007-379, s. 5.

§ 90B-16.
Title protection.

Except as provided in

G.S. 90B-10

, an individual who (i) is not certified, licensed, or associate licensed by this Chapter as a social worker, (ii) does not hold a bachelor’s or master’s degree in social work from a college or university having a social work program accredited or admitted to candidacy for accreditation by the Council of Social Work Education, or (iii) has not received a doctorate in social work shall not use the title “Social Worker” or any variation of the title.

The Board is authorized to enforce title protection pursuant to this section in accordance with

G.S. 90B-13

.

The Board shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

2009-88, s. 3; 2012-72, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-72, s. 4, effective June 26, 2012, substituted “associate” for “provisionally” in subsection (a).